Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the  Department of Human Services, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the following amounts,  for the
following purposes:
(1) Central services ....................  $ 104,160,018
(2) State assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ............ $ 331,408,079
(3) Self-sufficiency programs ...... $ 497,566,764
(4) Vocational rehabilitation
services ................................. $ 35,739,931
(5) Child welfare programs......... $ 894,366,021
(6) Aging and people with
disabilities programs.............  $ 1,435,740,472
(7) Intellectual/developmental
disabilities programs.............  $ 1,236,051,009
(8) Debt service ..........................  $ 25,759,190
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and
Medicare receipts and including federal funds for indirect  cost recovery, Social Security
Supplemental Security Income recoveries and the Child Care and  Development Fund, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in this section, collected or received
by the Department of Human Services, for the following purposes:
(1) Central services .................... $ 2,720,938
(2) State assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ............ $ 50,883,745
(3) Self-sufficiency programs ...... $ 119,309,422
(4) Vocational rehabilitation
services ................................. $ 4,965,191
(5) Child welfare programs......... $ 37,724,151
Enrolled Senate Bill 5529 (SB 5529-A) Page 1
(6) Aging and people with
disabilities programs............. $ 271,042,288
(7) Intellectual/developmental
disabilities programs............. $ 22,825,663
(8) Shared services ..................... $ 165,607,015
(9) Debt service .......................... $ 1
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in  section 2 of this 2021
Act, collected or received by the Department of Human  Services, for the following purposes:
(1) Central services .................... $ 111,699,288
(2) State assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ............ $ 237,160,322
(3) Self-sufficiency programs ...... $ 545,854,286
(4) Vocational rehabilitation
services ................................. $ 84,615,390
(5) Child welfare programs......... $ 564,640,847
(6) Aging and people with
disabilities programs.............  $ 2,939,859,067
(7) Intellectual/developmental
disabilities programs.............  $ 2,592,490,393
SECTION 4. For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, expenditures by the Department
of Human Services for federal supplemental nutrition assistance payments are not limited.
SECTION 5. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2021, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $15,859,656, to  be allocated to the Department of Human Services for
positions to reduce the number of double-fill positions associated with the child welfare pro-
gram.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2022, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 6.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$24,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by  the Department of Human Services from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Department of Human  Services, for long-term
care workforce development and  training and the capital improvement and emergency
preparedness program.
SECTION 7. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5529 (SB 5529-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5529 (SB 5529-A) Page 3